apertium-bas/apertium-bas.bas.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Bassa

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>   ! Noun

! Number morphology
%<sg%>  ! Singular
%<pl%>  ! Plural

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

Prefixes ;


LEXICON Prefixes

%<sg%>:m NounRoot1 ;
%<pl%>:b NounRoot2 ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Ninfl

%<sg%>:m Nouns ;
%<pl%>:b Nouns ;

LEXICON RegNounInfl

%<n%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>s # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NounRoot1

ut # ; ! "person"
an # ; 

LEXICON NounRoot2

ut:ot # ; 
an:on # ;




! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
